Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2142.03
Enhanced employment area; use of eminent domain prohibited.

Eminent domain shall not be used to acquire property that will be transferred to a private party in the enhanced employment area.

Laws 2007, LB562, § 9.